Massachusetts, session 194th, S516.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 56 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
section 48, the following section:-
Section 48A. Protecting Poll Workers
(a) Terms used in this section shall be construed as follows, unless a contrary intention
clearly applies:-
“Election worker” shall apply to any person working full time, part time or under
contract, whether paid or unpaid, for the commonwealth of Massachusetts or any municipality
and who is performing duties and activities in connection with, and in the furtherance of, the
administration of elections as contained in chapters 50 to 56 inclusive.
“Election duties” shall apply to duties and responsibilities required or authorized by law
to administer and conduct elections as provided in chapters 50 through 56 inclusive.
of 3

“Family members” shall apply to an election worker’s spouse, child, parent, or any
person residing in their same household.
“Personal information” shall apply to an election worker’s home address, personal phone
number(s), personal email address, personal motor vehicle, motor vehicle number plate,
photograph and image of the election worker, their home and motor vehicle.
(b) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly harass, threaten, coerce or intimidate or
attempt to harass, threaten, coerce or intimidate an election worker with the intent to impede or
interfere with them while they are engaged in the performance of their duties or with the intent to
retaliate against the election worker on account of the election worker’s performance of their
official duties.
The conduct or acts described in this section shall include, but not be limited to, conduct
or acts conducted in person, by gesture, verbally, by mail and by use of a telephonic and
telecommunication device and electronic communication device including, but not limited to,
any device that transfers signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data and intelligence of any
nature transmitted in whole and in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photo electronic and
photo optical system, including, but not limited to, electronic mail, internet communications, cell
phone communications, instant messages and facsimile communications.
(c) It shall be unlawful for a person to knowingly make available on the internet personal
information about an election worker or family members of an election worker if the
dissemination of personal information promotes harassment, threats, coercion and intimidation or
poses an imminent and serious threat to the safety of the election worker or their family member.
of 3

(d) Whoever shall be guilty of the crime under this section shall be punished by
imprisonment for not more than four years or by a fine of not more than $10,000 or both.
(e) Whoever, after having been convicted of the crime under this section, commits a
second or subsequent such crime under this section, shall be punished by imprisonment for not
more than ten years or by a fine of not more than $25,000 or both.
of 3